src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-haebue39_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - häbü: # Noun (39) häbü 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     häbü+N+Sg+Nom: häbü
     häbü+N+Sg+Gen: häü
     häbü+N+Sg+Par: häpü
     häbü+N+Sg+Ill: häppü
     häbü+N+Sg+Ine: [häün, häüh, häühn]
     häbü+N+Sg+Ela: häüst
     häbü+N+Sg+All: häüle
     häbü+N+Sg+Ade: häül
     häbü+N+Sg+Abl: häült
     häbü+N+Sg+Tra: häüs
     häbü+N+Sg+Ter: [häüniq, häüni]
     häbü+N+Sg+Abe: [häüldäq, häüldä]
     häbü+N+Sg+Com: [häügaq, häüga, häügä]
     häbü+N+Pl+Nom: [häüq, häü]
     häbü+N+Pl+Gen: [häpe, häpä]
     häbü+N+Pl+Par: [häpe, häpä]
     häbü+N+Pl+Ill: [häppehe, häppe, häppede, häppähe, häppä, häppäde]
     häbü+N+Pl+Ine: [häpen, häpeh, häpehn, häpän, häpäh, häpähn]
     häbü+N+Pl+Ela: [häpest, häpäst]
     häbü+N+Pl+All: [häpele, häpäle]
     häbü+N+Pl+Ade: [häpel, häpäl]
     häbü+N+Pl+Abl: [häpelt, häpält]
     häbü+N+Pl+Tra: [häpes, häpäs]
     häbü+N+Pl+Ter: [häpeniq, häpäniq, häpeni, häpäni]
     häbü+N+Pl+Abe: [häpeldäq, häpäldäq, häpeldä, häpäldä]
     häbü+N+Pl+Com: [häpegaq, häpägaq, häpega, häpäga]
